http://ora.ca.gov/rframedocs/ORABrief_SBCIn-Region_R93-04-003.doc

   Before the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California
   Rulemaking on the Commission's Own Motion to Govern Open Access to
   Bottleneck Services and Establish a Framework for Network Architecture
   Development of Dominant Carrier Networks R.93-04-003 Investigation on
   the Commission's Own Motion into Open Access and Network Architecture
   Development of Dominant Carrier Networks I.93-04-002 Order Instituting
   Rulemaking on the Commission's Own Motion Into Competition for Local
   Exchange Service R.95-04-043 Order Instituting Investigation on the
   Commission's Own Motion Into Competition for Local Exchange Service
   I.95-04-044 BRIEF OF THE OFFICE OF RATEPAYER ADVOCATES ON THE
   APPLICATION BY SBC FOR PROVISION OF IN-REGION, INTERLATA SERVICES IN
   CALIFORNIA AND COMPLIANCE WITH PUBLIC UTILITIES CODE SECTION 709.2
   DARWIN FARRAR Attorney for the Office of Ratepayer Advocates California
   Public Utilities Commission 505 Van Ness Ave. San Francisco, CA 94102
   Phone: (415) 703-1599 Fax: (415) 703-2262 August 23, 2001 Email:
   edf@cpuc.ca.gov TABLE OF CONTENTS Page Table of authorities iv II. THE
   AFFIDAVITS DO NOT DEMONSTRATE IV. COMPLIANCE WITH THE FCC'S ADVANCED
   CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE table of authorities Page Public Utilities Code
   Public Utilities Code Section 709.2 2,3,51,54,57 U.S.C. 47 U.S.C.
   Section 271 2, 3,4,5,6,8,9,13.14,27,44,46,47,51,52,54,55,56,57 47
   U.S.C. Section 251 3,4,5,6,17,19,20,21,26,56 47 U.S.C. Section 252 4 47
   U.S.C. Section 2724 2,43,46,47,48 Commission Decisions D.98-12-069 3
   R.00-02-005 4 A.01-02-024 7 A.01-02-035 7 D.99-11-050 7 D.00-08-011 8
   I.00-03-002 8 A.01-02-035 12 A.01-02-024 12 A.00-01-023 18 D.01-01-037
   23 R.97-10-016 (Draft Decision) 36 D.99-02-013 45,47 A.96-03-007 45
   D.86-01-026 47,48 D.87-12-067 49 D.92-07-072 49,50 D.99-02-013 51 CASES
   In the Matter of the Implementation of the Local Competition Provisions
   in the Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, Inter-Carrier
   Compensation for ISP-Bound Traffic, Order on Remand and Report and
   Order, CC Docket Nos. 96-98 and 99-68, FCC 01-131 (Released April 27,
   2001). 4 Implementation of the Local Competition Provisions in the
   Telecommunications Act of 1996, CC Docket 96-98, FCC 96-325, released
   August 8, 1996. (First Report And Order). See also 47 C.F.R. Section
   51.507(f). 17 See Memorandum Opinion and Order In re Application of
   Ameritech Corp. and SBC Communications for Consent to Transfer Control
   of Corporations Holding Commission Licenses and Lines, FCC 99-279, CC
   Docket No. 98-141,released October 8, 1999. (Hereafter SBC-Ameritech
   Order.) 17 Association of Communications Enterprises v. Federal
   Communications Commission, January 9, 2001, p.9. Ruling at
   HTTP://pacer.cadc.uscourts.gov/common/opinions/200101/99-144a.txt. 18
   Fourth Report and Order, In the Matter of Deployment of Wireline
   Services Offering Advanced Telecommunications Capability,CC Docket No.
   98-147, FCC 01-204, released July 12. 22 Deployment of Wireline
   Services Offering Advanced Telecommunications Capability, CC Docket No.
   98-147, Memorandum Opinion and Order, November 7, 2000. Cf. Hopfinger
   Affidavit, pp. 27ff. 23 Before the Public Utilities Commission of the
   State of California Rulemaking on the Commission's Own Motion to Govern
   Open Access to Bottleneck Services and Establish a Framework for
   Network Architecture Development of Dominant Carrier Networks
   R.93-04-003 Investigation on the Commission's Own Motion into Open
   Access and Network Architecture Development of Dominant Carrier
   Networks I.93-04-002 Order Instituting Rulemaking on the Commission's
   Own Motion Into Competition for Local Exchange Service R.95-04-043
   Order Instituting Investigation on the Commission's Own Motion Into
   Competition for Local Exchange Service I.95-04-044 BRIEF OF THE OFFICE
   OF RATEPAYER ADVOCATES ON THE APPLICATION BY SBC FOR PROVISION OF
   IN-REGION, INTERLATA SERVICES IN CALIFORNIA AND COMPLIANCE WITH PUBLIC
   UTILITIES CODE SECTION 709.2 I. INTRODUCTION Pursuant to the schedule
   established at the July 9, 2001 Prehearing Conference, the Office of
   Ratepayer Advocates (ORA) hereby submits its Brief regarding the June
   27, 2001 Draft Brief In Support Of Application By SBC For Provision on
   In-Region, InterLATA Services In California and the associated
   affidavits. (271 Filing). As provided for by the June 1, 2001 Assigned
   Commissioner's Ruling On Pacific Bell's Motion To Modify The Schedule
   Established To Address Public Utilities Code Section 709.2, ORA also
   addresses Pacific Bell's Showing Establishing Compliance With Public
   Utilities Codes Section 709.2 Requirements (709.2 Filing) which was
   filed concurrently with the 271 Filing. ORA's references herein to
   ``Pacific'' refer to both Pacific Bell Telephone Company and SBC. II.
   THE AFFIDAVITS DO NOT DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE The affidavits paint a
   rosy picture of full compliance by Pacific and a robust competitive
   environment in California. This picture is substantially different from
   what the Competitive Local Exchange Carriers (CLECs) have said, both in
   filed pleadings and in the various workshops and all-party meetings.
   ORA does not interconnect with Pacific and thus has no direct personal
   experience with the quality of the service Pacific provides to CLECs. A
   comprehensive assessment of Pacific's compliance with the Federal
   Telecommunications Act of 1996 (TA96 or the Act) subsequent Federal
   Communications Commission (FCC) Orders, and Section 709.2 of the Public
   Utilities Code cannot be done using only Pacific's Affidavits; the
   CLEC's evidence is also required. Therefore silence on a particular
   issue herein does not equate to ORA's acceptance of Pacific's
   representations. ORA expressly reserves the right to respond to all
   issues in its Reply Brief to be filed on September 12, 2001. The
   affidavits make bold assertions of Pacific's purported compliance with
   all applicable rules. Unfortunately, many of Pacific's affidavits do
   not contain any evidence in support of the assertions made. These
   assertions should be subjected to the rigors of evidentiary testing.
   The California Public Utilities Commission (Commission or CPUC) cannot,
   in good conscience, evaluate Pacific's Section 271 application in the
   absence of evidentiary hearings. Such hearings are also required by
   Section 709.2 of the Public Utilities Code. Pacific also relies heavily
   on the terms of its interconnection agreements with AT&T and Level 3 to
   support its claims of compliance, without any discussion of the
   significance of these particular interconnection agreements or their
   relevance to demonstrating compliance with the requirements of Section
   271. THE SECTION 271 CHECKLIST Section 271(c)(2)(B) of the
   Telecommunications Act of 1996 (TA96 or the Act) contains the 14 point
   ``checklist'' requirements which a Bell Operating Company (BOC) must
   satisfy prior to receiving approval to offer in-region interLATA
   services. In D.98-12-069the Commission determined that Pacific
   satisfied 4 of the checklist items: Nondiscriminatory access to the
   poles, ducts, conduits and rights-of-way owned or controlled by the
   Bell operating company at just and reasonable rates in accordance with
   the requirements of section 224 (checklist item 3); Until the date by
   which telecommunications numbering administration guidelines, plan, or
   rules are established, non-discriminatory access to telephone numbers
   for assignment to the other carrier's telephone exchange service
   customers. After that date, compliance with such guidelines, plan, or
   rules (checklist item 9); Nondiscriminatory access to such services or
   information as are necessary to allow the requesting carrier to
   implement local dialing parity in accordance with the requirements of
   section 251(b)(3) (checklist item 12); Reciprocal compensation
   arrangements in accordance with the requirements of section 252(d)(2)
   (checklist item 13). ORA has reviewed the affidavits submitted by
   Pacific addressing these checklist items. With respect to
   nondiscriminatory access to rights-of-way, access to telephone numbers,
   and dialing parity, the affidavits essentially state that nothing has
   changed from the circumstances that led the Commission to conclude that
   Pacific has satisfied these checklist items. (See D.98-12-069) ORA's
   review of the Mondon, Reisner and Deere Affidavits leads it to conclude
   that Pacific likely continues to be in compliance with the requirements
   of Sections 271(c)(2)(b)(iii), (ix) and (xii). With regard to
   reciprocal compensation (RC), the situation has changed. In its 1998
   Comments, ORA concluded that Pacific would be in compliance with this
   checklist item if it paid the disputed RC amounts billed to it by
   various CLECs. These disputes were largely based upon assertions that
   some of the traffic labeled as ``local'' was traffic being delivered,
   through CLECs, to internet service providers (ISPs), and that ISP-bound
   traffic was not ``local'' under Sections 251(b)(5) and 252(g). This
   Commission has previously held that local traffic is local traffic,
   regardless of what happens to the call after it terminates, be it to a
   person picking up the phone, a fax machine, or a modem bank. The FCC's
   subsequent issuance of the ISP Remand Order has raised some questions
   about this policy. Those questions will be resolved in the Reciprocal
   Compensation Rulemaking (R.00-02-005). The FCC has taken the position
   that disputes over reciprocal compensation for ISP-bound traffic are
   not relevant to assessing compliance with this checklist item.
   Pacific's witness Hopfinger asserts that all non-disputed amounts have
   been paid. If this assertion is, in fact, accurate, then it appears
   that Pacific is technically in compliance with this rule as it exists
   today. However, absent verification that all such payments have been
   made, it is not possible to conclude that Pacific has satisfied Section
   271(c)(2)(b)(xiii). ORA notes that the ISP Remand Order has been
   appealed. A. Interconnection In Accordance With The Requirements Of
   Section 251(c)(2) Statements in the Hopfinger, Tebeau and Deere
   affidavits suggest that Pacific is providing interconnection to CLECs
   that complies with the requirements of Section 251(c)(2)(A). CLECs may
   negotiate individual interconnection agreements with Pacific, or opt
   into the terms of an existing interconnection agreement, or seek the
   Commission's assistance in arbitrating an interconnection agreement
   pursuant to the process established in Section 252 of TA96. However,
   the affidavits are insufficient to show that Pacific is satisfying the
   technical feasibility requirement of Section 251(c)(2)(B).
   Specifically, the Affidavits do not discuss any instances in which
   Pacific has denied an interconnection request upon the grounds of
   technical infeasibility, together with an appropriate justification,
   or, alternatively, state affirmatively that Pacific has not denied any
   requests. ORA therefore cannot conclude that Pacific is meeting the
   Act's requirement and reserves the right to respond to other parties
   evidence regarding Pacific's compliance with the technical feasibility
   interconnection requirement. Section 251(c)(2)(C) requires that Pacific
   offer interconnection that is ``at least equal in quality'' to that it
   provides to itself and subsidiaries and affiliates, commonly referred
   to as the parity standard. As discussed in Section VI, infra, Pacific's
   Operations Support Systems (OSS) are not providing parity service to
   CLECs. Pacific is therefore not in compliance with the requirements of
   Section 251(c)(2)(C). Section 251(c)(2)(D) requires that
   interconnection be provided ``on rates, terms, and conditions that are
   just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory.'' As discussed below,
   Pacific's UNE prices are not in compliance with the Act and the FC's
   pricing rules. Pacific is therefore not in compliance with the
   requirements of Section 251(c)(2)(D), and cannot be in compliance until
   the current UNE prices are reduced to an appropriate TELRIC level and
   TELRIC-compliant prices are established for additional loop and
   transport UNEs. Therefore, ORA concludes that Pacific is not in full
   compliance with the requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(i) B.
   Nondiscriminatory Access To Network Elements In Accordance With The
   Requirements Of Sections 251(c)(3) And 252(d)(1) ORA has reviewed the
   Deere, Tebeau, Vandeloop and Scholl Affidavits regarding
   nondiscriminatory access to unbundled network elements (UNEs). The
   Affidavits purport to demonstrate that Pacific offers the FCC-required
   UNEs on a stand-alone basis with pricing which complies with the Act;
   e.g. which is ``just and reasonable'' as interpreted by the FCC. ORA
   does not dispute that Pacific offers access to UNEs to its competitors,
   including unbundled switching, transport and loops. However, Pacific
   cannot be said to be in compliance with the forward-looking incremental
   pricing required by the Act and the FCC. ORA therefore concludes that
   Pacific is not in compliance with Section 271(c)(2)(B)(ii). 1.
   Pacific's current UNE prices are not TELRIC-compliant Pacific makes
   much of the fact that this Commission approved rates that were said to
   be TELRIC compliant in D.99-11-050. However, those rates were based on
   1994 costs. Now, a few months before the year 2002, the network looks
   considerably different from how it did in 1994, and the cost
   characteristics have correspondingly changed. This Commission
   acknowledged this change by opening the UNE Reprice proceeding.
   D.99-11-050 established certain threshold criteria for qualifying a UNE
   for Commission repricing consideration. The key qualification is that
   the cost of the UNE must have changed at least 20% from the current
   price. The fact that the Commission determined to open the UNE Reprice
   proceeding, in response to a request from AT&T and Worldcom, makes it
   clear that the Commission has found that the evidence AT&T and Worldcom
   submitted to demonstrate that the current prices for the loop and
   switching UNEs are at least 20% too high was sufficiently persuasive.
   The non-cost-based 19% markup in all UNE rates is also extremely
   problematic. Moreover, this Commission has not yet adopted TELRIC
   compliant geographically deaveraged UNE prices, as required by the
   FCC's First Report And Order. In the Vandeloop Affidavit, Pacific
   asserts that the CPUC has adopted geographically deaveraged local loop
   rates, through the Pacific-AT&T Interconnection Agreement and through a
   Pacific accessible letter. While it is true that the CPUC allowed
   Pacific's three zone proposal to be used as an interim measure, it was
   accepted with reservations because the quality of the data used to
   derive the zones and the accompanying rates was considered to be highly
   questionable. The Final Arbitrator's Report (FAR), the Commission, and
   ORA are in agreement that before permanent geographically deaveraged
   prices and the appropriate number of zones can be adopted in
   California, a thorough re-examination of various UNE costs and prices
   must occur. C. Local Loop Transmission From The Central Office To The
   Customer's Premises, Unbundled From Local Switching Or Other Services
   ORA does not dispute that Pacific is offering access to the basic
   unbundled local loop UNE. However, as discussed in Section III.(B)(1),
   supra, the current pricing for the loop UNE is not TELRIC-compliant.
   Additionally, this Commission has not established TELRIC prices for
   certain other loops, such as DS-1 and DS-3 loops. Competitively priced
   access to these types of loops is needed to enable competitors to offer
   innovative high-speed services to consumers. Until appropriate
   TELRIC-compliant costs and prices are established for all loops,
   Pacific will not be in compliance with the Section 271(c)(2)(B)(iv). D.
   Local Transport From The Trunk Side Of A Wireline Local Exchange
   Carrier Switch Unbundled From Switching Or Other Services ORA does not
   dispute that Pacific is offering unbundled transport to CLECs. However,
   as was the case with the loop UNE, the current prices for transport are
   not TELRIC-compliant. Nor have costs and prices been established for
   optical carrier (OC) level transport. Competitively priced access to
   this type of transport is essential for competitors to offer innovative
   services which would provide benefits to consumers. Pacific is not in
   compliance with the requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(v). E. Local
   Switching Unbundled From Transport, Local Loop Transmission, Or Other
   Services As discussed above, Pacific's prices for the unbundled
   switching UNE are not TELRIC compliant. Additionally, the pricing of
   this UNE does not comply with the requirements of TA96 because Pacific
   assesses separate recurring charges for each vertical service that is
   ordered by a CLEC. This excessive pricing by Pacific also leads to
   inflated costs for the UNE platform service offering (UNE-P). The UNE-P
   costs more than Pacific's average residential rate per month, making it
   virtually impossible for a CLEC to compete using the UNE-P. Pacific's
   comparison of its UNE-P prices with its own average retail service
   rates omits important costs that are borne by CLECs seeking to use the
   UNE-P to serve customers. In the Affidavit of Linda Vandeloop, Pacific
   contends that the prices that Pacific offers CLECs are reasonable and
   encourage ``...vigorous competition in California.'' Attached to the
   Vandeloop Affidavit is a survey authored by Billy Jack Gregg, Director
   of the West Virginia Public Service Commission Consumer Advocate
   Division. Pacific uses this survey to support its position that
   Pacific's UNE and UNE-P prices are favorable in comparison to prices
   offered in other states. Upon closer inspection, the prices that
   Pacific offers to CLECs do not compare as favorably with those in other
   states as Pacific contends. ORA contacted the author of the survey
   identified by Pacific and inquired if the rates were correct and, if
   not, to please provide a corrected version of the information.
   Attachment A of this report is the corrected UNE Rate/Residential Rate
   Comparison Matrix (Table 3) ORA received from Mr. Gregg on July 17,
   2001. The corrected version shows the switching cost per month to be
   $2.47, rather than $1.51 as reported in the earlier version.
   Additionally, the author adjusted the average residential rate per
   month to include increases in the Subscriber Line Charge and the end
   user Universal Service Fund Surcharge. The new comparison matrix paints
   a much different picture than that of the earlier version of the rate
   comparison matrix attached to the Vandeloop Affidavit. The corrected
   matrix shows increases in the ratio of UNE-P costs to the average
   residential retail rate. In the corrected matrix, the low cost areas
   show UNE-P costs to be 78.8 % of the average residential rate, in the
   middle cost areas 96.6 %, and in the low cost areas 158.2 %. (see
   Attachment A) This calculation makes it clear that CLECs using the
   UNE-P would be at a price disadvantage vis-Á-vis Pacific in all but the
   lowest cost areas of the state. Unfortunately, these are not all the
   costs facing CLECs wishing to compete using Pacific's UNE-P offering.
   The average residential rate from the rate comparison matrix includes
   all surcharges and taxes, but the total costs to CLECs using UNEs do
   not. When these taxes and surcharges are included with the UNE-P,
   competing in any area of the state would not make economic sense for
   CLECs. For example, included in the average residential rate are taxes
   and surcharges, but they are not included in the UNE-P costs. Also
   missing from the costs of a full UNE-P are the costs for shared
   transport which would increase the costs to the CLECs even more. When
   these charges are included in the UNE-P, as shown in Attachment B,
   Table 1, it would be infeasible for a CLEC to purchase the UNE-P to
   serve customers, as the cost of the UNE-P is higher than the Pacific
   Bell average residential rate in all zones. Pacific's comparison of its
   unbundled switching and UNE-P to other states is misleading because
   Pacific does not include vertical services in its price for the
   unbundled switch. The FCC defines local switching to include all
   vertical features the switch is capable of providing. Pacific's
   provisioning of unbundled switching is discriminatory and
   anticompetitive because, unlike other ILECs, Pacific does not include
   this switching functionality in its basic switching UNE price. When a
   CLEC utilizes Pacific's unbundled switching, the price should include
   the functions inherent in that UNE, such as those enabling the
   provision of vertical services. Under Pacific's plan, each vertical
   service that the CLEC provides to end-users must be purchased ``a la
   carte.'' When Pacific purchases a switch all of the functionalities of
   that switch are included in the price. By definition UNEs capture all
   of the cost drivers of a particular part of the network, such as the
   switch. Pacific charges CLECs for the functionality of the switch
   through the switching UNE. Although vertical services are an inherent
   feature of the switch, Pacific requires that competitors pay both
   recurring and non-recurring charges for each vertical feature. Since
   Pacific does not include vertical services in its unbundled switch
   port, the absence of these services should be considered in the
   comparison of the prices for Pacific's unbundled switch UNE prices with
   those of other ILECs. It would be more appropriate to include the
   recurring costs that Pacific charges to the CLECs to resell these
   services when comparing Pacific with other companies. A full complement
   of vertical services, which has an incremental cost of zero to Pacific
   since they are included in the functionality of the switch, would cost
   a CLEC over $6.00 per month. A more conservative estimate would be the
   1.5 features per line at an average feature cost of $0.62 as suggested
   by AT&T. This more conservative estimate results in an additional $0.93
   cents added to the switch port per month. With this adjustment
   Pacific's unbundled switching rates are shown to be in the highest 20%
   of the largest ILECs. ORA therefore concludes that Pacific is not in
   compliance with Section 271(c)(2)(B)(vi). F. Nondiscriminatory Access
   to 911 And E911 Services, Directory Assistance Services To Allow The
   Other Carrier's Customers To Obtain Telephone Numbers, And Operator
   Call Completion. There were significant problems with the E911 service
   and access which Pacific provided to CLECs in the 1996-98 time frame.
   ORA acknowledges that not all of the problems were the fault of
   Pacific. ORA's review of the system upgrades and enhancements described
   in the Deere Affidavit suggests that these enhancements, combined with
   more experience in working with the CLECs, may have substantially
   resolved the E911 operational issues. However, some CLECs have raised
   E911 operational concerns; ORA awaits the opportunity to review the
   CLEC's evidence before it can determine whether Pacific has satisfied
   the requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(vii). Similarly, concerns have
   been raised regarding nondiscriminatory access to operator services and
   directory assistance databases. Again, ORA awaits the opportunity to
   review the CLECs evidence. G. White Pages Directory Listings For
   Customers Of The Other Carrier's Telephone Exchange Service. In
   addition to past problems in this area a number of concerns were raised
   at the April 4-5, 2001 workshops. ORA awaits the opportunity to review
   the CLECs evidence before it can determine that Pacific has satisfied
   the requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(viii). H. Nondiscriminatory
   Access To Databases And Associated Signaling Necessary For Call
   Completion. In addition to past problems in this area a number of
   concerns were raised at the April 4-5, 2001 workshops. ORA awaits the
   opportunity to review the CLECs evidence before it can conclude that
   Pacific has satisfied the requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(x).
   Telecommunications Services Are Available For Resale In Accordance With
   The Requirements Of Sections 251(c)(4) And 252(d)(3). ORA does not
   dispute Pacific's claim that it makes its retail services available to
   CLECs for the purposes of resale to CLEC end users. However, ORA is
   aware that the CLECs have raised operational and pricing concerns
   regarding Pacific's performance and practices as a wholesaler of
   communications services. ORA awaits the opportunity to review the CLECs
   evidence before it can determine that Pacific has satisfied the
   requirements of Section 271(c)(2)(B)(xiv). IV. COMPLIANCE WITH THE
   FCC'S ADVANCED SERVICES ORDERS AND THE MERGER CONDITIONS Pacific Bell
   claims that ``evidence of commercial volumes of competition in
   California is overwhelming and irrefutable.'' Whether Pacific's showing
   actually demonstrates ``irreversible'' competition, the relevant test,
   is not at all clear. Nor is the significance of ``commercial volumes''
   as impressive when the end result is, as Pacific admits, competitive
   local exchange carriers having captured only 300,000 residential
   customers using their own facilities in all of Pacific's franchise
   territory. The overwhelming majority of California ratepayers continue
   to have no choice of local exchange service provider, the evidence
   Pacific cites notwithstanding - and, increasingly, there is no choice
   of provider other than Pacific for digital subscriber line (DSL)
   broadband access service in Pacific's serving area. Pacific's grip on
   residential local exchange service has not been challenged to date; its
   near monopoly on the provisioning of DSL service is being consolidated
   rapidly; and with the approval of its Section 271 application Pacific
   will be in a position to leverage both its local exchange monopoly and
   its DSL monopoly into a commanding position in the long distance
   market. Ratepayers have little to look forward to as the competitive
   promises of the Telecommunications Act of 1996 are erased before their
   eyes. A. Advanced Services Of the DSL providers in California, Pacific
   is clearly the most dominant. As of June 2001, Pacific had well in
   excess of 500,000 DSL customers; its competitors had around 25,000
   lines. Pacific's dominance is growing and the market share of its DSL
   competitors is in decline, the opposite of what would be expected in an
   actually open, competitive market. Three of Pacific's major DSL rivals
   are either gone (e.g. Northpoint, Rhythms) or partially owned by SBC,
   Pacific's parent (Covad). Pacific has a market share in DSL that is
   comparable to its 97% market share in residential access lines.
   Pacific's dominance has additional consequences in the assessment of
   Pacific's application. Consider for example, Pacific's claim that its
   OSS work at commercial volumes, respecting DSL provisioning as well as
   other services, can be based only on third-party tests. There has been
   no real-world commercial testing of Pacific's OSS because there has
   been no real-world DSL competition. Even by Pacific's lax standards and
   allowing for the low demand put on its OSS by less than commercial
   volumes Pacific has met only 87-90% of the benchmarks set to assess its
   performance. Both the FCC and this Commission should anticipate the
   likely outcome of Pacific's Section 271 clearance - actually a
   regulatory regime based on assumed competition will result in a new
   version of the monopoly, where the assumption of competition exists in
   name only, and ratepayers face a monopoly power in local exchange, DSL,
   and, in the future, long distance, unrestrained by traditional monopoly
   regulation or effective competitive challenge. Even Pacific cannot
   avoid the problematic character of the present situation. Pacific
   appears to want to have it both ways. In its Draft Brief Pacific claims
   robust local competition on the one handbut on the other hand says that
   only when SBC is freed from the statutory barriers to long distance
   entry will competitive local entry be sparked. The very fact that the
   bulk of residential access lines held by competitors are from cable
   providers (Cox and AT&T), not competitors using the public switched
   network, attests to how high the barriers to residential entry remain
   on that network. Even with a new service such as DSL, where there were
   new players and significant market demand, the barriers to entry have
   so easily been moved from local exchange service to broadband access is
   further proof of Pacific's ascendancy and the precarious nature of
   competition in California. B. SBC Advanced Services, Inc. (ASI) SBC's
   ASI, the separate advanced services affiliate of Pacific, was
   established as a condition of SBC's acquisition of Ameritech. Even as
   the FCC agreed to separate affiliate status for SBC's advanced services
   offerings, it was obliged to recognize that the separate affiliate
   structure might fail to provide safeguards against SBC and its regional
   franchise carriers ``leveraging [their] control over certain bottleneck
   facilities into the nascent advanced services market.'' The FCC weighed
   this risk against what it felt would be the public interest advantages
   of rapid advanced services deployment. It also relied on the
   ``rebuttable presumption'' that the new advanced services affiliate
   would not be a ``successor and assign'' of SBC and therefore not
   subject to the ILEC's obligations under 251 of the Act. This
   interpretation did not withstand judicial scrutiny. On January 9, 2001,
   the D.C. Circuit Court vacated the FCC's order regarding the separate
   affiliate requirement of the SBC-Ameritech merger. (Association of
   Communications Enterprises v. Federal Communications Commission,
   January 9, 2001.) The court ruled that ``the Commission may not permit
   an ILEC to avoid 251(c) obligations as applied to advanced services by
   setting up a wholly owned affiliate to offer those services.'' The
   court also determined that the separate affiliate structure did nothing
   to prevent an ILEC from using ``its local loop monopoly to leverage its
   position in the advanced service market.'' For practical purposes, ASI
   is Pacific, and vice versa. Thus, when Pacific cites ASI's use of DSL
   ordering interfaces as evidence of its pro-competitive OSS
   capabilities, the Commission should keep in mind that Pacific is
   actually provisioning DSL to itself. The Ascent Ruling has led to a
   stay of A.00-01-023 wherein Pacific seeks () to transfer advanced
   service assets to ASI. Pacific has recently asked for a further stay of
   the proceeding so that it may continue ``to evaluate the economic,
   regulatory and legal implications of reintegrating advanced services
   operations of ASI into Pacific and the other SBC incumbent LECs.'' The
   issues surrounding the status of ASI are largely invisible in Pacific's
   271 Draft. Pacific makes only brief reference to ASI's agreement with
   DSLnet which Pacific states is ``consistent with 251(c),'' as though
   that were the end of the matter. But even with respect to this
   agreement, there are problems. To obtain wholesale DSL services,
   non-affiliate CLECs must deal with Pacific's affiliate ``CLEC'' even
   though it is really dealing with Pacific, the monopoly provider. Thus,
   while ASI is a retailer of Pacific's DSL offerings, and a wholesaler of
   Pacific's DSL offerings, it is simultaneously an ILEC with monopoly
   power to CLECs and a CLEC with monopoly advantages over ratepayers.
   Another fact that Pacific does not mention in its Draft Brief is that
   the agreement with DSLnet contains a gag provision related to 271.
   Section L of the agreement, entitled SBC ILEC's 271 Application,
   provides that the contracting CLEC must agree to ``support the federal
   271 application (``Federal Application'') of SBC ILEC...,'' and that
   the ``CLEC shall not comment, formally or informally, on any effort of
   by SBC ILEC to gain state commission support for its federal 271
   application (``State Application'').'' Only a holder of monopoly
   building blocks upon which ``customers'' depend could expect to enforce
   such mandatory gag requirements. Also overlooked by the Draft Brief is
   the fact that ASI, as Pacific's house CLEC, does not have the same
   interest in purchasing UNEs as unaffiliated CLECs. ASI can rely upon
   Pacific's end-to-end Broadband Service offering (not available as a
   UNE). Nor need ASI be interested in collocating at Pacific's Project
   Pronto remote terminals, as are other CLECs. Specifically, ASI is not
   interested in interconnecting with Pacific via line cards in New
   Generation Digital Loop Carriers, as are other CLECs. Similarly, ASI
   relies upon virtual collocation, the least economically onerous form of
   collocation, for placement of its DSLAM's in Pacific's central offices.
   ASI's affiliate status relieves it of the normal security concerns
   unaffiliated carriers would have in making their equipment subject to
   Pacific's physical jurisdiction. The line between Pacific and ASI is
   further blurred by the fact that the FCC agreed to allow Pacific to own
   the advanced services equipment that originally would have been owned
   and operated by the separate advanced services affiliate created in
   accord with the SBC-Ameritech merger conditions. Had this waiver not
   been granted, and had ASI owned and placed its own line cards in Next
   Generation Digital Loop Carrier (NGDLC) equipment in Project Pronto
   remote terminals, other, non-affiliated CLECs would have had the right
   to do the same. The effect of this waiver, whether the FCC intended it
   or not, has been to force unaffiliated CLECs to purchase and resell
   Pacific's Broadband Service offering rather than rely on unbundled
   network elements - that is, to become echoes of ASI in the marketplace.
   Confined to resale, unaffiliated CLECs cannot deploy an advanced
   service different than what ASI itself is marketing. The absence of,
   and Pacific's unwillingness to provide, unbundled network elements
   associated with DSL provisioning of Project Pronto capabilities puts a
   much less positive gloss on Pacific's claims about its compliance with
   the UNE access checklist item. Thus, to the extent that Project Pronto
   is Pacific's network of the future, it is being closed to unaffiliated
   CLEC access except via resale - an especially ironic result after the
   Ascent Ruling where resale obligations under 251(c) were the crux of
   the controversy. Unaffiliated CLECs are being made to trade access to
   UNEs for less economically attractive and less technically robust
   resale offerings (which are in any case voluntary and may be withdrawn
   by Pacific), certainly a trade-off not contemplated by the 1996 Act.
   Pacific's closing of Project Pronto to unbundling constitutes a clear
   violation of checklist item 2, the requirement that Pacific provide
   ``nondiscriminatory access to network elements on an unbundled basis at
   any technically feasible point on rates, terms and conditions that are
   just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory.'' Given the technical
   capabilities of the Project Pronto architecture - chiefly that NGDLC
   equipment and line cards may allow migration of voice services to DSL
   frequencies and ATM -- failure to have access to UNEs on that
   architecture will seriously compromise competitive entry and will have
   the effect of eroding not just advanced services competition but
   competition for voice customers over Pacific's new network
   architecture. Pacific is building a new closed network to replace the
   ``old'' network it is obligated to open under the 1996 Act. V.
   COLLOCATION ORA has no independent way to verify that Pacific's claims
   regarding collocation are accurate. Those who collocate with Pacific
   are better able to provide statements of their experience. As Pacific's
   network functionalities are distributed from the central office to the
   NGDLC equipment deployed with Project Pronto, access to that
   architecture, via collocation and interconnection, becomes more
   important. Because the network is technologically dynamic, the
   collocation requirements must be equally dynamic. As the FCC notes,
   ``...changes in technology have not only resulted in the deployment of
   new equipment that was barely, if at all, used in the public switched
   telecommunications network five years ago when the 1996 Act was passed,
   but also have enabled dramatically different network architectures and
   designs.'' The FCC went on to observe that, ``Without mandatory
   collocation rights, competitors would not be able to achieve direct
   access to incumbent bottleneck facilities, and competitors would be
   thwarted in their ability to deploy alternative, innovative
   technologies.'' This is why ORA emphasizes the importance of
   competitive access to Project Pronto. Pacific claims to be in
   conformity with the interconnection and collocation requirements of the
   Act as originally drafted. Of equal importance is the degree to which
   Pacific allows access to its new network configurations on a
   nondiscriminatory basis. Otherwise, the deployment of new technology
   will allow Pacific to ignore or evade its established legal
   obligations. Technological innovation by the ILEC then becomes the
   means by which its legal obligations are rendered moot and competition
   foiled not by the market but by deliberate technical obstructionism.
   Pacific's tortured reading of provisioning interval requirements is
   also suspect. Pacific claims to be in conformity with the intervals
   specified in the Advanced Services Collocation Waiver Order because the
   order allows states to establish their own intervals. Pacific argues
   that California has done so and that because it obeys the California
   order it obeys the federal order. Pacific's claim begs the question.
   The FCC rule is that the state must ``affirmatively'' specify different
   intervals. California cannot have done this because the intervals it
   established were done so before the FCC ruled. There cannot have been
   an affirmative specification of a different interval if the difference
   wasn't evident when the intervals were promulgated. Given the
   importance of provisioning intervals and the serious impact on
   competitive business plans that delays in Pacific's provisioning of
   collocation requests have, this Commission should take Pacific's
   failure seriously. ORA concludes that Pacific is not in compliance with
   the requirement of Section 251(c)(6). VI. OSS TESTING AND INCENTIVE
   ISSUES Contrary to SBC/Pacific's claims in the Executive Summary and
   Introduction to SBC's Draft Brief, Pacific has by no means met all of
   the Commission's (or the FCC's) Operational Support Systems
   (OSS)-related preconditions for interLATA relief under Section 271. The
   ``qualitative proof'' that Pacific provides in support of these claims
   as well as in support of its alleged satisfaction of the FCC's 14-point
   checklist, misrepresents Pacific's OSS performance. Pacific also draws
   overly broad, premature, and in some cases erroneous conclusions with
   regard to the extent to which Pacific actually has met the
   preconditions for OSS approval. In particular, Pacific makes highly
   suspect claims about (1) the non-discriminatory nature of its
   performance serving its California CLEC customers (Id., p.iii-iv,
   7,8,33-52; et passim) and (2) the adequacy of this performance in
   demonstrating that Pacific is providing CLECs with a reasonable
   opportunity to compete in the local market. (Id., p.7-8,12, and Part
   II.) Furthermore, SBC makes claims about the adequacy of Pacific's OSS
   performance as assessed by: (1) the third-party audit of Pacific's
   performance reports, (2) the third-party test of Pacific's OSS, (3)
   Pacific's alleged performance on CPUC-adopted performance measures, and
   (4) Pacific's proposed performance remedy plan, which are at best,
   misleading, and at worst, untrue. (Id., p.iii-iv,5-6; Part II, pp.
   92-97; et passim) A. Nondiscriminatory Access To OSS. ORA agrees with
   Pacific that the ``FCC has consistently found that nondiscriminatory
   access to OSS - the systems, information, and personnel that support
   network elements or services offered for resale - is a prerequisite to
   the development of meaningful competition.'' (See Draft Brief, p.33) In
   fact, nondiscriminatory access to OSS must be conclusively demonstrated
   before this Commission recommends approval of Pacific's 271 application
   to the FCC. Nondiscriminatory access to OSS is crucial to the evolution
   and expansion of meaningful competition in the telecommunications
   industry. Access to OSS is discriminatory if either (1) the incumbent
   local exchange carrier (ILEC) does not allow one or more competitive
   local exchange carriers (CLECs) to access a particular OSS service; or
   (2) the ILEC provides service to CLECs that is statistically worse than
   the service that the ILEC provides to its own retail customers. For
   example, although Pacific does not refuse to process service change
   orders for CLECs, it did not provide CLECs with nondiscriminatory
   access to this vital provisioning service in the fourth quarter of 2000
   for UNE Loop 2-wire digital ISDN capable service. In D.01-01-037, the
   Commission approved the use of a system of statistical analysis to
   determine whether or not an ILEC was providing parity
   (nondiscriminatory) service. The Commission ``created a set of
   procedures for assessing the performance measurement results to
   identify competitive barriers'' and defined parity as a situation in
   which ``the ILEC is providing services in substantially the same period
   of time and manner (including quality) to the CLECs as it is providing
   to itself.'' Nondiscriminatory access to OSS, must be defined as no
   statistically significant difference between the service provided to
   Pacific's own customers and the service provided to CLECs. B. Pacific
   Does Not Provide Nondiscriminatory Access To OSS. The evidence does not
   support Pacific's claims of nondiscriminatory access to its OSS. The
   Draft Brief contains several claims that Pacific's systems provide
   nondiscriminatory access to OSS. for example, at page 36, the Draft
   Brief cites two third-party reviews conducted by Cap Gemini and GXS.
   Both Cap Gemini and GXS ``found that Pacific's systems currently
   process CLEC transactions in a nondiscriminatory fashion...'' (See
   Draft Brief, p.36) Specific services are cited for which
   nondiscriminatory access is alleged include: (a) ordering for
   xDSL-Capable Loops (p.56), (b) Stand-alone loops (p.65), (c) unbundled
   local switching, (p.70), (d) nondiscriminatory access to 911, directory
   assistance and operator call completion services (p.72), and (e) access
   to databases and associated signaling for call routing and completion
   (p.76). SBC then concludes on page 82 that ``the performance results
   clearly demonstrate that Pacific provides CLECs nondiscriminatory
   access to wholesale arrangements that facilitate the resale of
   Pacific's services.'' Unfortunately, Pacific has not provided
   sufficient evidence to support these assertions. In order for the
   Commission to conclude that Pacific provides nondiscriminatory access
   to its OSS, there must be evidence that parity service is being
   provided to CLECs by Pacific, and that such parity service is not the
   result of declining service to Pacific's own retail customers. The
   Commission's own Telecommunications Division (TD) reviewed Pacific's
   OSS Test results and found that there is evidence of non-parity
   performance in the number of chronic failures. TD also concluded that
   there is evidence of non-parity OSS performance that cannot be
   explained by random variation. (See TD Report, p.1) Furthermore, the TD
   Report shows that Pacific provided worse service to CLECs than to its
   own customers for 28% of all parity submeasures from October to
   December, 2000. (See TD Report, Figure A) Indeed, for 38 of the
   submeasures where parity service was provided to CLECs (from April,
   1999 to December, 2000), the in-parity finding was primarily the result
   of a deterioration of service to Pacific's own ratepayers, rather than
   an improvement in service to CLECs. These submeasures included vital
   services such as bill accuracy, jeopardized orders, completion of
   service orders, number of missed due dates, trouble reports for new
   service, and repeat troubles within a 30-day period. C. OSS Test
   Results Pacific also relies upon Cap Gemini's highly flawed OSS Test
   Results to support its assertions. The problems with the OSS testing
   process alone are extensive enough for the Commission to disregard the
   results in making an informed decision on Section 271 approval. Due to
   the many problems with the way in which OSS testing was conducted, the
   OSS tests failed to demonstrate either that Pacific is operationally
   ready to handle commercial volumes of transactions, or that Pacific is
   providing nondiscriminatory access to CLECs. For example, in the Cap
   Gemini analysis, a number of methodological issues regarding test
   design and implementation such as blindness, sample size, the
   disposition of so-called ``abandoned orders,'' and the treatment of
   repair scenarios rendered the test results questionable and possibly
   biased. These issues are treated only peripherally, if at all, in the
   body of Cap Gemini's Final Report. However, as they are central to
   assessing the findings and recommendations contained in the Report, not
   to mention the validity and reliability of the test results themselves,
   ORA's comments will focus on some of these concerns, and how they
   impact overall assessment of the OSS testing process and Pacific's
   performance. D. Blindness The Test Generator (TG) for the Final Report,
   Dan Mackey, claimed there were ``a half dozen individuals at Pacific''
   that he was aware of ``who were brought into the loop and as to the
   nature of the test in very controlled and measured circumstances.''
   (R.T. Vol. WS-31, p.2261) He claimed that the maintenance of blindness
   was given particular attention, and that the testing team was
   ``scrupulously careful, especially at the initial phase of the test, to
   make sure that blindness was maintained at all times.'' (R.T. Vol.
   WS-31, p.2262) However, the nature of these ``very controlled and
   measured circumstances'' was not made clear. Moreover, Mr. Mackey also
   indicated that, after the EDI testing was completed for the first
   pseudo-CLEC (Napa Telecommunications), the test team, with the
   Commission's concurrence, ``let a few selected Pacific individuals know
   [about the simulated testing] so they could also help maintain the
   blindness of the test with the rest of the Pacific people who may have
   been involved.'' (Id., emphasis added) The Test Generator's claim that
   letting ``a few selected Pacific individuals'' know about the testing
   would actually ``help maintain the blindness of the test'' gives us
   pause. Moreover, this claim was simply asserted on several occasions;
   it was not supported by any concrete, substantiating evidence. Mr.
   Mackey also claimed that ``since we were dealing in that case with
   three specific individuals [from Pacific] on the EDI test team, it was
   better to let them know so that they themselves could also hold the
   shield to protect others from finding out.'' (R.T. Vol. WS-32, p.2263)
   Again, it is unclear from this assertion precisely what ``holding the
   shield to protect others from finding out'' amounted to, in terms of
   the actual conduct of the testing. Pacific did not appear to have any
   particular procedure, such as the signing of a non-disclosure
   agreement, to ensure that those Pacific employees who were ``in the
   loop'' acted in ways that protected the blindness of the test
   procedures. (Id.) Also, there apparently was no consideration given to
   weighing the unspecified but claimed ``benefits'' of test disclosure to
   Pacific's EDI test team participants against the ``costs'' (i.e., in
   terms of compromising the validity and reliability of test results) of
   allowing these three central participants from Pacific to have direct
   knowledge of the testing process. At the very least, these factors
   should have been concretely weighed and discussed before arriving at
   the final testing procedure. In addition to the three individuals from
   Pacific on the EDI test team who were informed of the OSS testing,
   there were a number of other individuals from Pacific who were, in one
   way or another, involved with and fully aware of the testing process.
   Ms. Clark, the project manager for CAP's Test Administrator/Manager
   (TAM), initially pointed out that ``the Test Administrator worked
   directly with an OSS test team from Pacific Bell whose purpose was to
   support us in our activities.'' According to Ms. Clark, this test team
   was fully aware of the testing process. There also was possibly an
   additional person, ``a financial person with in Pacific Bell, who was
   responsible for processing the invoices for the Test Administrator, the
   Test Generator, who probably was aware of what those invoices
   covered.'' Mr. Peter Chang of the Telecommunications Division pointed
   out that these particular individuals were in addition to those persons
   from Pacific Bell and SBC management who had to be generally
   knowledgeable about the testing process in order for it to take place
   at all. Ms. Clark subsequently acknowledgement that there was also a
   technical advisor at Pacific's call center where the Capacity and
   Scalability tests were being conducted, who served as a contact person
   for the Test Administrator, and was therefore also knowledgeable about
   the testing process. The notion that the Testing Administrator, in the
   name of protecting the blindness of the testing procedure, would see
   fit to compromise that very blindness by bringing more and more of
   Pacific's employees or other representatives into the testing loop is
   non sensical. Before accepting any of the results of the testing of
   Pacific's OSS components and processes at face value, or recommending
   approval of Pacific's 271 Application, the Commission should take
   determine whether or not decisions which compromised the blindness of
   the testing procedure (in the name of protecting that very blindness),
   may have had the unfortunate consequence of so biasing the outcome and
   reliability of the testing process as to make any interpretation of the
   results meaningless for assessing the functioning and adaptability of
   Pacific's OSS in providing nondiscriminatory service to CLECs and their
   customers. E. Sample Size The apparent inconsistency and confusion in
   the disposition and reporting of rejected or abandoned test cases
   during Cap Gemini's Test Effort has important implications for the
   accuracy of reported sample size, and for the interpretation of
   reported results. During one of the workshops, Ms. Lichtenberg of
   Worldcom pointed out discrepancies between the number of UNE loop with
   port test cases issued to the Test Generator, and the number of orders
   for which a completion was received back. As explained by Ms. Pitts of
   CAP, this discrepancy was accounted for by the fact that the
   ``missing'' cases were ones that had been abandoned. (R.T., Vol. WS-31,
   p.2243, li.13, 28.) However, because of the manner in which test cases
   were tracked and the orders reported, it was not possible easily to
   distinguish between rejected cases that were abandoned for some reason,
   and those for which follow-up supplements were issued by the Test
   Generator. (R.T., Vol. WS-31, p.2244, li.3-12.) Therefore, the
   discrepancy noted by Ms. Lichtenberg did not reflect a difference in
   the actual disposition of test cases, but rather in the proportion of
   orders (PONs) for which Service Order Completions (SOCs) were not
   received back from the Test Generator. In some cases, multiple,
   different PONs where issued for a single test case. (R.T., Vol. WS-31,
   p.2152, li.1-4.) Ultimately the reported differences between the number
   of test cases issued and the number of SOCs received back was an
   artifact of the tracking number system used by Cap Gemini, rather than
   an accurate reflection of the actual disposition of the number of test
   cases in a given sample. This fact, combined with the admittedly
   inconsistent manner in which rejected orders were treated (Transcript,
   p. 2154, li.18-24, 01/17/01), significantly clouds issues related to
   the actual sample sizes used for the different components of the OSS
   testing process, and raises significant doubts about the validity of
   any conclusions based upon the testing. F. ``Abandoned'' or Returned
   Orders In the course of the Commission workshops concerning the Pacific
   Bell OSS testing and Cap Gemini's Final Report, it became clear that,
   during the course of testing, a number of test cases (in the form of
   Local Service Requests (``LSRs'') were, for one reason or another,
   returned (or ``rejected'') by the Local Service Center (LSC). Walt
   Willard of AT&T raised the initial question as to how to ascertain
   which and how many of these orders were returned to the Test
   Administrator/Manager (``TAM'') by the Test Generator (``TG''), and
   what the eventual disposition of those orders was. (R.T., Vol. WS-31,
   p.2145) While Mr. Mackey initially responded that the orders that were
   returned to the TAM were tracked in the TG's daily activity logs, it
   became clear later on in the discussion that reject analyses were not
   conducted in every instance, and that the TG simply abandoned some test
   cases. According to John Wilkinson, the TG's Project Manager, there
   were at least two different circumstances in which such rejections
   occurred. One was when a ``friendly,'' or pre-designated, end-user
   recruited for the testing process declined to participate further in
   the testing. (R.T., Vol. WS-31, p.2148, li. 26; p.2149, li. 8,) In such
   instances, the test case was abandoned, and the relevant LSR was
   cancelled. The other instance occurred when a simulated order requested
   the removal of a particular feature from a customer's premise, but the
   rejected order indicated that the customer was not receiving that
   feature in the first place. (R.T., Vol. Ws-31, p.2150, li.7-9) In this
   type of case, the TG ``would return the order back to marketing for
   further analysis, back to the test administrator, and they would
   provide direction as to whether it was appropriate at that point to
   cancel the order or to sub the order, so I think that both occurred . .
   . .'' However, a little later on in the transcript, Mr. Mackey conceded
   that there were also instances in which such so-called mismatched
   features simply would be abandoned, ``because we weren't able to
   complete them.'' ) The inconsistent manner in which rejected orders
   were handled by the TAM, as well as the related (and unresolved) issue
   of whether abandoned or replacement orders were counted or included in
   the Report's findings, cast serious doubt upon the validity and
   reliability of those findings. Cap Gemini's own account of the
   tracking-number system it used to track each test-case scenario
   indicated that test cases that were classified as ``abandoned'' were
   those that, ``because of the details of the test case, did not perform
   an appropriate test of the OSS process,'' or that ``didn't work.'' It
   is unclear what criteria of appropriateness were applied in this
   regard, or what might have been ``wrong'' with particular test cases,
   other than the two types of problems discussed above. In any event,
   while the TAM assigned new tracking numbers to those test orders that
   were corrected and resubmitted, it is unclear what became of the
   initial orders represented by the original tracking numbers, or whether
   they remained linked to each other in some way for the purposes of data
   collection and reporting. This inconsistency in the processing and
   reporting of test case results may further bias the Report's findings,
   since those simulated findings are thereby even less likely to reflect
   accurately the results of a comparable real-time ``test'' of the
   accuracy, timeliness, capacity, and scalability of Pacific's OSS. G.
   CLECS' ASSESSMENT OF THE OSS TESTING PROCESS The CLECs also found
   problems with the OSS testing process. In their comments on OSS
   testing, the CLECs stated that ``the OSS Test results do not provide
   sufficient assurance that competitors will be well-served or that
   California consumers can have confidence that they will be able to
   obtain quality service in a timely and efficient manner and that their
   service orders will be properly and timely provisioned. Nor will these
   steps be sufficient to give Pacific a free pass to long distance
   entry.'' The CLECs further stated that: The Test Administrator
   concluded that the ``performance data analyzed revealed that the
   Pseudo-CLECs generally received parity service levels from Pacific.''
   The Act and the Commission's rules require parity, not ``parity in
   general.'' The Test Administrator's statistician admitted that the
   phrase ``generally in parity'' means nothing in terms of the Act, and
   despite requests from the CLECs, he declined to quantify his assessment
   of Pacific's performance. And the statistics clearly show that the
   third party tester received better service than that provided to actual
   CLECs doing business in the State of California. (Id, p.5) H. SBC Makes
   ``Factual'' Claims That Are Not Substantiated By The References That It
   Cites In Support Of Them Throughout its 271 Draft Brief, SBC cites
   numerous references to the affidavits included in its Application in
   support of specific claims it makes about to the functioning and
   performance of Pacific's OSS. However, in a number of cases, the
   material referenced either does not provide any empirical support for
   the claims advanced in the Draft Brief, or does not address the
   specific claim being made at all. For example, under Part II.D,
   Checklist Item 4, Section 1.a., p.57, with regard to Pacific's loop
   qualification system, the Draft Brief states that `` . . . CLECs have
   access to the exact same loop makeup information as Pacific's retail
   operations, in the same manner and within the same time frames,'' and
   references the Chapman affidavit, paragraphs 13 and 32 in support of
   this statement. However, neither of the cited affidavit paragraphs
   makes any reference to Pacific's retail operations, much less to
   whether or not CLECs have access to this information in a manner or
   time frame equivalent to that which Pacific provides to itself.
   Paragraph 32 simply restates the claim quoted above (namely, that
   ``CLECs have non-discriminatory access'' to loop make-up information),
   without providing any empirical basis for such a conclusion. Later in
   that same section, the Draft Brief states that ``the loop provisioning
   interval for CLECs is the same as or shorter than the equivalent
   interval for ASI.'' (See Draft Brief, p.58) Chapman's Affidavit is
   cited in support of this statement. (See Chapman Aff., ? 55) However,
   paragraph 55 of the Chapman affidavit again simply restates the claim
   advanced in the Draft Brief, without providing any empirical evidence
   to support this assertion. Furthermore, the loop provisioning and
   installation intervals described by SBC do not reflect the actual time
   it takes for Pacific to provide these loops to the CLECs and its own
   customers. Rather, these intervals reflect the time Pacific requires as
   a standard business practice to install a UNE loop circuit or a retail
   service requiring a loop facility. There is a specific performance
   measure, Measure 7 (Average Completion Interval)among the
   Commission-adopted performance measures that evaluates, among other
   things, the average provisioning interval for UNE loops. Pacific fails
   to cite any of the data for that performance measure in support of its
   assertions. Pacific also states that it ``has consistently provided
   high quality and timely maintenance and repair services for ISDN BRI
   loops.'' (See Draft Brief, Section 1.e., pp.63-64, emphasis added.) In
   support of this statement, the Draft Brief cites the Gwen Johnson
   Affidavit. The particular paragraph cited states, in part, that ``[in]
   the past three months, maintenance performance for the ISDN UNE loop
   product has been very good,'' and provides a table which gives average
   maintenance performance results for February - April 2001 for XDSL UNE
   Loops for Measures 19, 20, 21, and 23. (See Johnson Aff., ? 125)
   However, since these are all parity-based measures, Pacific's
   performance on them can only properly be assessed in relation to
   comparable data on Pacific's maintenance performance on these same
   measures for Pacific's affiliate company ASI. It is improper for SBC to
   draw a conclusion about Pacific's maintenance performance for ISDN UNE
   loops based solely upon the failure rates for Pacific's performance on
   these maintenance measures for its CLEC customers. A valid assessment
   of Pacific's performance on these measures must be based upon data that
   shows whether or not that performance is in parity with the service
   that Pacific provides to its own customers. SBC has failed to provide
   such data here. I. SBC'S Claim That Pacific's Performance Reporting And
   Remedy Plan Meets Its Section 271 Obligations Is Erroneous SBC's claim
   that Pacific's performance reporting and remedy plan provides
   ``probative evidence'' that Pacific has met its Section 271 obligations
   and that its entry would be consistent with the public interest is
   false. Further, SBC makes false and misleading statements about CPUC
   decisions regarding the adoption of the JPSA and its performance
   remedies plan. First and foremost, the May 24, 2001 decision regarding
   adoption of JPSA is not a final order. As stated by Judge Walwyn, ``The
   `open issues' on which the Settling Parties cannot agree have been
   discussed extensively in the motions and replies submitted by the
   parties. Because some of the open issues involve further modifications
   to the measurements and standards that we adopted in D.99-08-020, the
   JPSA should be received as a partial statement of OSS performance
   standards and measurements. We have indicated in Appendix B, which
   elements are subject to revision, pending our resolution of the open
   issues.'' In fact, there are unresolved open issues for all performance
   measures. Pacific's performance remedies plan provides no assurance
   that ``Pacific will continue to provide CLECs with nondiscriminatory
   service in the wake of section 271 relief.'' (See Draft Brief, p. 92.)
   While Pacific claims to put ``more than $46 million at risk each month,
   the actual remedy payments calculated under Pacific's plan fall far
   below this amount .. Pacific's remedies plan is unreasonable when
   compared with the models presented by other parties. Pacific's May 18
   Comments stated that its model would have resulted in remedy payments
   of only $1.36 million in 2000 compared to $94.56 million under the
   CLECs plan, and $52.47 million using ORA's plan. ORA calculates that
   Pacific's 1999 net revenues from local exchange service were
   approximately $1.25 billion. Thus, the total amount of annual remedy
   payments ($1.36 million) under Pacific's plan is only 0.11% of
   Pacific's net revenues. If Pacific's plan were adopted by the
   Commission, the low remedy amounts calculated in its plan would
   constitute a risk to ratepayers that service quality could deteriorate
   in the future. The level of remedy payments is especially important in
   a highly concentrated market such as the California local
   telecommunications exchange market. Market concentration is typically
   measured by use of the Herfindahl-Hirschman Index (HHI).,, Both the FCC
   and other antitrust agencies refer to a market with an HHI greater than
   1,800 as ``highly concentrated. The California local telecommunications
   market has an HHI of 6437 of which Pacific's share is 6071, or over
   three times the threshold of a highly concentrated market. Therefore,
   remedy payments must be high enough to offset any potential gains
   Pacific might make by reducing the quality of service or by engaging in
   anti-competitive behavior. a. Tier 1 & Tier 2 Pacific's plan separates
   all performance measures and submeasures into four categories, each of
   which would be subject to a different remedy payment calculation.
   However, Pacific fails to provide a comprehensive list of which
   specific submeasures would be covered by each category. Furthermore,
   Pacific's plan seeks additional mitigation such as adjusting `` the
   number of observed failures for the effects of random variation.'' The
   statistical model adopted by the Commission in the Interim Opinion
   already accounts for random variation, and any additional mitigation
   will result in the double counting of random variation and a remedy
   system biased in favor of Pacific. Pacific attempts to incorporate
   additional mitigation for ``sub-measures where small sample sizes are
   aggregated under the Commission's rules per the Interim Opinion,'' for
   which it will pay one remedy payment for each missed submeasure (after
   adjusting for further allowable failures by incorporating an
   ``F-table''). The $500 remedy payment suggested by Pacific is too low
   and does not provide a strong incentive for Pacific to provide parity
   service. The limited remedy payment provides Pacific with an incentive
   to allow service to deteriorate, since the payment is limited to $500
   regardless of the level of Pacific's service. b. Procedural Caps
   Pacific proposes that monthly remedy payments be subject to a cap of
   1/12 of 36% (3%) of annual net revenue from local exchange services.
   Additionally, it proposes that the Commission establish a procedural
   cap of $10 million per month for all CLECs, or $3 million per month to
   any one CLEC (See Pacific Comments To The OSS Test Plan Report, p.22).
   ORA is opposed to both absolute and procedural remedy payment caps
   because they would also in effect ``cap'' service improvements by
   providing the ILECs with an incentive to allow service to deteriorate
   once the cap is reached. Pacific's proposal also defeats the purpose of
   a self-executing model, since it requires the Commission to hold
   hearings once an arbitrary payment limit is reached. The resulting
   hearings could strain the resources of smaller CLECs, thereby giving
   Pacific a competitive advantage in the hearing process. Pacific's
   proposal would transform the OSS remedy process from an incentive-based
   self-executing model into a litigation-based reasonableness review. J.
   SBC'S Assertions About Pacific's Performance In Provisioning
   XDSL-Capable Loops Are Misleading, And Based Upon Insufficient
   Performance Data SBC asserts that the performance data ``unequivocally
   demonstrate that Pacific provides nondiscriminatory access to
   xDSL-capable loops and related services, and consequently that CLECs
   have a meaningful opportunity to compete in the California market for
   advanced services.'' To bolster its claim, SBC relies on Pacific's
   performance on a particular set of benchmarked submeasures. (PM2 -
   Average FOC/LSC Notice Interval, submeasures 2-201300, 2-203900, and
   2-206500.) These are measures of the average time from Pacific's
   receipt of a valid service request to its returning a Firm Order
   Confirmation (FOC)/Local Service Confirmation (LSC) to the customer.
   Also, while Pacific may have performed adequately on those specific
   submeasures, performance on those submeasures alone is not a
   comprehensive indicator of overall xDSL provisioning performance.
   Despite SBC's claims that Pacific is provisioning xDSL loops in a
   ``timely manner,'' ORA's analysis of OSS performance data shows that:
   (1) Pacific is failing on certain key measures of provisioning, and (2)
   the overall trend in xDSL provisioning is a steady decline in this
   performance in the retail resale sector. While Pacific remains in
   parity on certain xDSL provisioning submeasures, ORA's statistical
   analysis of Pacific's performance data shows that in those submeasures
   Pacific's service performance to its own retail customers is steadily
   declining over time. When Pacific's performance to its retail customers
   declines on a particular submeasure, the corresponding resale parity
   measure changes to reflect that decline in retail service. In this way,
   Pacific is able to reduce the level of service to CLECs, while
   technically remaining in ``parity'' and thus avoiding the payment of
   performance remedy incentives. Such behavior is anti-competitive and
   harmful to all classes of ratepayers. Provisioning time is the
   make-or-break period for CLECs to obtain and retain their customers. If
   provisioning of service to a CLEC is delayed, or if there are problems
   with the service early on, a customer will likely perceive that the
   CLEC's quality of service is worse than Pacific's. The customer will
   likely then respond by switching to another provider, usually back to
   Pacific. The following table illustrates where Pacific's performance in
   provisioning xDSL service to its own retail customers is declining over
   time, while remaining in parity and paying no remedies. Performance
   Measure (PM) PM Title Description of measure In Parity in Terms of OSS
   716700 Average Completed Interval for UNE Loop 2 wire Digital xDSL
   capable Average business days from receipt of valid, error-free service
   request to completion date in service order system for new, move, and
   change orders. In parity with no failures. 722600 Average Completed
   Interval for UNE Loop 2 wire Digital xDSL capable Average business days
   from receipt of valid, error-free service request to completion date in
   service order system for new, move, and change orders. In parity with
   no failures. . 160220 Percentage Troubles in 30 Days for New Orders -
   Resale DS1 Measures the percent of network customer trouble reports
   received within 30 calendar days of service order completion. In parity
   with no failures. 160590 Percentage Troubles in 30 Days for New Orders
   - Resale DS1 Measures the percent of network customer trouble reports
   received within 30 calendar days of service order completion. In parity
   with no failures . VII. SECTION 272 ISSUES SBC, Pacific, and
   Southwestern Bell Communications Services, Inc. (SBCS), hereinafter
   referred to as ``Applicants'', included in the Section 271 filing
   certain affidavits that purport to demonstrate that they have met the
   requirements of Section 272 of TA96 as part of their effort to receive
   FCC approval of this Section 271 application. Section 272 requirements
   cover the following three areas: A. Structural Requirements The
   separate long distance affiliate (in this case, SBCS): Shall operate
   independently from the Bell operating company. (Section 272 (b)(1));
   Shall maintain books, records, and accounts in the manner prescribed by
   FCC that are separate from the books, records, and accounts maintained
   by the Bell operating company. (Section 272(b)(2)); Shall have
   officers, directors, and employees that are separate from those of the
   Bell operating company. (Section 272(b)(3)); May not obtain credit
   under any arrangement that would permit a creditor, upon default, to
   have recourse to the assets of the Bell operating company; (Section
   272(b)(4)). B. Accounting Requirements The separate long distance
   affiliate (in this case, SBCS): Shall conduct all transactions with the
   Bell operating company on an arm's length basis with the transactions
   reduced to writing and available for public inspection. (Section
   272(b)(5)); Shall account for all transactions with the separate
   affiliate in accordance with the accounting principles and rules
   approved by FCC. (Section 272(c)(2)); Shall obtain and pay for a joint
   Federal/State audit every 2 years conducted by an independent auditor.
   (Section 272(d)(1)). C. Nondiscriminatory Requirements (Non-Accounting
   Safeguards) The separate long distance affiliate (in this case, SBCS):
   Shall fulfill any requests from unaffiliated entities for telephone
   exchange service and exchange access within a period no longer than the
   period in which it provides such telephone exchange service and
   exchange access to itself or its affiliates. (Section 272(c)(1)); May
   not discriminate between the separate affiliate and any other entity in
   the provision or procurement of goods, services, facilities, and
   information, or the establishment of standards. (Section 272(c)(2));
   Shall not provide any facilities, services, or information concerning
   its provision of exchange access to the Section 272 affiliate unless
   such facilities, services, or information are made available to other
   providers of interLATA services in that market on the same terms and
   conditions. (Section 272(c)(2)); Shall charge its separate affiliate
   under Section 272, or impute to itself (if using the access for its
   provision of its own services), an amount charged to any unaffiliated
   interexchange carriers for such service. (Section 272(c)(3)); May
   provide any interLATA or intraLATA facilities or services to its
   interLATA affiliate if such service or facilities are made available to
   all carriers at the same rates and on the same terms and conditions,
   and so long as the costs are appropriately allocated. (Section
   272(b)(4)): May not market or sell telephone exchange services provided
   by the [BOC] unless the [BOC] permits other entities offering the same
   or similar services. (Section 272(g)(1)). Mr. Robert Henrichs's
   affidavit addresses Pacific's alleged compliance with Section 272
   accounting safeguards. Mr. Joe Carrisalez addresses Section 272
   compliance by SBCS. Ms. Linda Yohe discusses Section 272 non-accounting
   safeguards (non-discrimination requirements). D. The Applicants
   Assertions Are Not Evidence Demonstrating Compliance With Section 272
   Requirements. The affidavits purport to demonstrate that Applicants
   have met the ``structure separation'', ``accounting safeguard'', and
   ``non-discriminatory'' requirements. However, the affidavits provide
   nothing more than paper promises; there is no evidentiary record or
   audit for the Commission to review respecting SBCS, only Pacific's
   promises. In light of the dearth of actual evidence, the Commission
   must consider how Pacific has itself met the non-discriminatory
   standards of conduct to see if any patterns of behavior have emerged.
   CLECs have filed several complaints with this Commission alleging
   anti-competitive and discriminatory conduct by Pacific. The substance
   of these complaints indicates that Pacific may not have properly
   complied with the Section 271 nondiscriminatory treatment requirements.
   For instance, the California ISP Association, Inc. (CISPA) recently
   filed a complaint alleging that Pacific and SBC Advanced Solutions,
   Inc. (ASI, is the DSL-providing subsidiary of SBC and corporate sister
   of Pacific) illegally discriminates against unaffiliated Internet
   Service Providers (ISPs) by refusing to provide them with reasonable
   and adequate digital subscriber line (DSL) transport services. Current
   law requires that Pacific provide access to its high frequency portion
   of the local network lines (to be used for providing DSL services) to
   its affiliate (if there is one) and the competitors on an equal basis.
   In this CISPA case, the Commission is looking into whether Pacific is
   engaged in discriminatory treatment as the incumbent carrier toward
   competing DSL service providers and competing ISPs. E. An Audit is
   Needed to Effectively Verify if Applicants Meet Section 272
   Requirements. Only after an audit is performed can the Commission be
   assured that the Applicants have complied with the separation and
   auditing requirements of Section 272. In granting SBCS's application
   for a Certificate of Public Convenience And Necessity (CPCN) to provide
   long distance service in California (to be effective upon Pacific's
   attaining approval to do so from FCC), the Commission recognized the
   importance of the audit. In D99-02-013, the Commission took note of
   evidence that Pacific and its affiliates have occasionally failed to
   comply with the Commission's affiliate transaction rules, and pointed
   out the importance of an audit to identify errors and make early
   correction given that: The record in this proceeding is replete with
   evidence that PBCom and Pacific Bell, quite understandably, will
   cooperate to the maximum extent permitted by law in marketing PBCom's
   new services. The record also shows that there are opportunities,
   through inadvertence or otherwise, for the Telesis companies to slip
   over the line of permissible behavior. (See D.99-02-013, p.55) The
   Commission further noted that California's existing affiliate
   transactions rules are tailored more precisely to Pacific than those of
   the FCC, and that therefore California-distinct matters should be
   examined in a separate audit conducted at the same time, and in
   cooperation with the FCC audit. Specifically, the Commission ruled: The
   FCC has delegated authority to its Common Carrier Bureau to form the
   joint audit team in cooperation with the Commission. Our order today
   directs our Office of Ratepayer Advocates to consult with the Common
   Carrier Bureau on the timing and retention of the independent auditors
   who will conduct the audit, and then arrange for an audit of Commission
   affiliate transaction rules. (Id., p.56) The Commission should be
   especially cautious about approving the applicants' Section 271 request
   absent a track record in Section 272 compliance. By allowing Pacific to
   launch into the long distance market based on unsubstantiated promises
   about its having met its Section 272 obligations, the Commission risks
   giving Pacific unchecked leverage to monopolize both voice and data
   telecommunication services in its California serving areas. If the
   Applicants are able to exercise market power on behalf of SBCS,
   leveraging their dominance in local and DSL services, both customers
   and competitors will be severely harmed. The hunt for remedies after
   injury, as in the case of energy, may come at a high price to ratepayer
   interests. Accordingly, the Commission should consider having the audit
   conducted within a year of any Section 271 approval and should impose
   severe penalties and/or sanctions upon the Applicants should the audit
   reveal that the Applicants failed to comply with Section 272 and this
   Commission's affiliate transaction requirements. Only the certainty of
   severe consequences will be a sufficient deterrent to ensure that the
   Applicants will comply with the CPUC and the FCC's rules and
   requirements. F. The Commission Should Direct The Applicants To Fully
   Cooperate With The Commission Staff And ORA Throughout The Section 272
   & D.99-02013 Audit Requirements. It is crucial that the Commission
   direct the Applicants to be fully cooperative when the above-mentioned
   audit is conducted. The Commission and ORA have encountered
   difficulties in accessing Pacific's records for auditing purposes,
   especially over last 15 months. Pacific has resisted allowing ORA's
   conducting or overseeing the New Regulatory Framework (NRF) audit of
   Pacific. That NRF audit is currently being conducted by the
   Telecommunications Division (TD) and its consultants, and ORA is
   closely monitoring the findings. Quite apart from the controversy
   surrounding ORA's participation, this audit was initially ordered in
   D.94-06-011 and has been delayed in no small part due to Pacific's
   refusal to accommodate ORA's discovery requests. Pacific objected to
   all of the follow-up data requests ORA sent out in that NRF audit, and
   been similarly resistant to TD's own inquiries. Pacific has argued that
   there was no formal proceeding associated with the NRF audit, hence
   Pacific did not need to respond to ORA's outstanding Public Utilities
   Code Section 314.5 audit data requests . Pacific may assert the same
   spurious grounds for not being forthcoming to Commission or ORA
   inquiries about its meeting the Section 272 standards. While ORA hopes
   that Pacific and its subsidiaries and affiliates will be more
   cooperative with ORA when the required Section 272 audit commences,
   Pacific may again complain that there is no ``proceeding'' underway
   that would justify Commission discovery. This is of great concern to
   ORA, particularly if the Commission approves the Applicants' 271
   filing, closes this phase of the associated proceeding, and leaves the
   Section 272 audit unattached to an open proceeding. One of the
   conditions the Commission should impose on the Applicants, should the
   Commission approve their request for Section 271 ``relief,'' is that
   the Applicants shall fully cooperate with ORA for the Section 272 &
   D.99-02-013 audit(s). ORA should and must be able to access all books,
   records, and premises for the audit. Pacific should be severely
   penalized if the Applicants fail to meet these commitments. The
   Commission has fined Pacific for failing to cooperate with the
   Commission's auditors. In D.86-01-026 the Commission stated: Of course
   the only means of meaningful investigating or testing the
   reasonableness of such transactions is to audit both ends, at the
   utility and its affiliate. This has never been an easy task. Often we
   lack the auditing resources which we would prefer to have, but
   notwithstanding these resource impediments the situation is untenable
   when the few auditors we do have are impeded. Under enabling provisions
   of the Public Utilities Code, we have full access to utilities' books
   and records, and we view impediments to our auditors as being direct
   impediments to our ability to regulate....Furthermore, as a means of
   providing an incentive to the Telesis Group to fully cooperate, to put
   a price on our displeasure, and since our record is not sufficiently
   developed in view of the incomplete staff audit to fully find PacBell's
   payments to affiliates reasonable, we will reduce PacBell's gross
   revenue requirement by $4 million. (See D.86-01-026, pp.260-261) It
   should be made clear to Pacific that obstructions behavior will not be
   tolerated when it is time for the Section 272 compliance audit. The
   Commission should consider imposing much more significant penalties if
   SBC, Pacific and their subsidiaries or affiliates fail to fully
   cooperate in the Section 272 and related audit(s). The Commission must
   not countenance permitting its authority to be flouted. G. Any
   Commission Approval Of The Applicant's 271 Filing Should Not Be
   Construed As Approval Of The Applicants' Affiliate Transaction
   Operating Practices As Described In Attachment D Of The Henrichs
   Affidavit. Attachment D. of Mr. Henrichs' affidavit contains Ameritech,
   Nevada Bell, Pacific Bell, The Southern New England Telephone Company &
   Southwestern Bell Telephone Company Operating Practice 125 MP (OP125MP)
   regarding affiliate transactions. The Applicants state that the purpose
   of OP125MP is to establish an affiliate transaction policy and process
   within the ``telcos'' to be followed by all departments for contract
   administration and reporting of shared administrative services,
   tariffed and non-tariffed services provided to affiliated companies,
   and to establish the procedures for ensuring compliance with FCC and
   state commissions rules for affiliate transaction accounting safeguards
   for purchases from, and sales to, affiliated companies. OP125MB
   provides some details of the regulatory requirements established by
   Section 272 of the Act and FCC Dockets 86-111 & 96-150 governing
   affiliate transactions and nonregulated activities. The Applicants
   correctly point out that the Commission largely adopted FCC part 64 and
   part 32 rules and requirements. However, this Commission has imposed
   many affiliate transaction rules that go beyond those set by the FCC.
   The Commission's affiliate transaction rules are primarily contained in
   D.86-01-026, D.87-12-067, and D.92-07-072. In this filing, the
   Applicants stated that these Commission affiliate transaction rules and
   requirements are incorporated in the OP125MP as part of the filing. It
   is not clear that this is so. ORA disagrees with both the relevance and
   appropriateness of some of the affiliate transaction rules/requirements
   as stated in OP125MP. The Commission has not formally addressed or
   resolved all the items Pacific suggests it will rely upon. For
   instance, in Section, 5.1, the Applicants state: CPUC Decision
   92-07-072 placed additional restrictions on services provided to
   Pacific Bell Information Services (PBIS), limiting those services to
   those defined as `critical or essential'. Contrary to this statement,
   the Commission intended D.92-07-072 to reaffirm the Commission's
   affiliate transaction rules imposed on Pacific and its affiliate
   transactions generally, not to limit them artificially to PBIS. This
   dispute arose again Pacific's Section 851 Application (99-07-020) and
   it is currently awaiting Commission resolution. Another example derives
   from Section 10.3, where the Applicants state: Transfers between Telcos
   and transfers from Affiliates to a Telco, do not incur the 25% fee. ORA
   agrees that Pacific does not incur 25% fee if an affiliate transfers an
   employee to Pacific. However, the Commission has not adopted the same
   rule for transfers between telcos. ORA is concerned that under OP125MP,
   Pacific could transfer its employees to another SBC telco, and then
   have those employees further transferred to a non-telco affiliate in
   order to avoid paying the 25% employee transfer fees. The Commission
   has adopted a policy that when Pacific transfers an employee to an
   affiliate, that affiliate has to pay Pacific 25% employee transfer fee.
   In adopting this rule, the Commission has not specified that the other
   SBC telcos are not treated as Pacific's affiliates. OP125MP also
   loosely elaborates on the Commission's Section 851 requirements and the
   detailed procedures for Pacific's employees to follow regarding any
   Section 851 filing. There the Applicants appear to identify ``assets''
   or ``property'' to mean merely ``physical or tangible'' ones. The
   examples described are: administrative office space, furniture, office
   equipment, telephone plant, etc. However, the Commission has not
   limited the property subject to Section 851 jurisdiction to only
   physical assets . This proceeding is not the proper forum for Pacific
   to revise the Commission's affiliate transaction rules/requirements.
   There is an affiliate rules and reporting OIR (R.01-01-001) open and
   Pacific can, and should, use that forum to ask the Commission to review
   Pacific's affiliate transaction rules if Pacific desires to do so. If
   the Commission approves the Applicants' Section 271 filing, such
   approval should not be interpreted as adoption of OP125MP as submitted
   by the Applicants in this Application, and the Commission should
   expressly state so. The Commission should consider imposing strict
   penalties if Applicants are found not to comply with Section 272 and
   the Commission's affiliate transaction requirements. Only severe
   consequences would be sufficient deterrence to ensure that the
   Applicants comply with the rules and requirements after Section 271
   approval has been granted. The Commission should direct the applicants
   to fully cooperate with the Commission and ORA throughout the Section
   272 & D.99-02-013 audits. The Commission's approval of the Applicant's
   Section 271 Filing should not be construed as approval of affiliate
   transaction OP125MP as submitted in Attachment D of the Henrichs
   Affidavit. VIII. PUBLIC UTILITIES CODE 709.2 The Commission Must Ensure
   that No Potential Competitive Harm Exists Before Granting Pacific 271
   Authority In Order to Comply with 709.2 of the P.U. Code Pacific claims
   that it has established compliance with Public Utilities Code Section
   709.2 (the Costa Bill) through the PB Com decision. (D.99-02-013)
   Pacific also asserts that the subsections that comprise 709.2 echo the
   competitive checklist and the other detailed subparts of Section 271 of
   the Telecommunications Act of 1996, and therefore Pacific's compliance
   with Section 271 necessarily assures that it is in compliance with
   709.2. Pacific is wrong. There are criteria specific to the Costa Bill
   which are not covered by the competitive checklist related to the
   measurement of the impact of Section 271 approval upon the competitive
   intrastate interexchange market in California. The key difference
   between the 14-point competitive checklist set forth in Section 271 and
   California's Costa Bill is that the California statute states that this
   Commission must ``determine[d] that there is no substantial possibility
   of harm to the competitive intrastate interexchange telecommunications
   markets,'' a requirement which not addressed in Section 271, which
   deals only with the opening of the local market. Pacific's current
   market share in local, intraLATA toll and DSL markets will only be
   replicated in the long distance market, to the detriment of ratepayers
   and competitors. Furthermore, Pacific's attempts in various affidavits
   to assure the Commission that local and interexchange competition are
   flourishing in Texas and New York are misleading and should be given no
   weight as a projection or forecasting tool for what will happen in
   California. If granted, Section 271 authority in California will only
   serve to augment Pacific's monopolistic presence in the local exchange
   market. The Commission must examine this issue of competitive harm in
   view of Pacific's market share and facilities-based competition. On
   this issue, Pacific seeks to establish that facilities-based
   competition has grown based on interconnection trunk orders. In the
   Tebeau affidavit Pacific argues that, ``the numbers demonstrate that
   customers in California have a choice in local service providers, and
   that competing providers have established themselves as a significant
   and growing presence in the market place.'' In addition, Mr. Tebeau's
   Table 2 illustrates 3 different methodologies he used ``to estimate the
   number of lines served by facilities-based CLECs in California'' in
   order to demonstrate that ``the current level of competition in
   California is substantial.'' These numbers, along with the subsequent
   listing of percentages representing CLEC switching and collocation
   presence in California are misleading, unsupported, and simply do not
   lend any degree of credence to this unjustifiable assertion. First, the
   first methodology utilized displays a 2.75:1 ratio for interconnection
   trunks, which only serves to significantly inflate estimated CLEC
   market coverage to 15.3%. While the more appropriate measure is the
   third methodology, which incorporates a 1:1 ratio, none of these
   methodologies is adequately supported by studies for proper
   verification. Accordingly, the 7.1% market share cannot on the surface
   be characterized as ``substantial'' or ``significant'', as Mr. Tebeau
   would have it. Subsequently, Mr. Tebeau indicates that CLECs have the
   potential to serve a majority of Pacific's access lines in California
   via a series of percentages that are not at all meaningful measures of
   the current state of competition in California. Simply because CLECs
   have installed ``enough switching capacity in California to serve over
   88% of Pacific Bell access lines in the State'' doesn't mean that they
   can or will ever necessarily serve any more than a small fraction of
   the lines that Pacific does. Mr Tebeau's estimate of switching capacity
   is based upon consultant's report which itself is replete with
   unsupported numbers and lacking in methodological descriptions.
   Furthermore, in his sweeping assessment that CLEC presence in
   California is pervasive in both larger and smaller counties Mr. Tebeau
   fails to quantify the level of CLEC market share in these areas. Table
   5 provides only minimal support to these hollow inferences as it shows
   that 94.4% of Pacific's wire centers are collocation wire centers
   without specifying the robustness of interconnection in these
   facilities, or the lack thereof. Pacific's market power in all sectors
   is clear in the market share statistics for residential, business, and
   PBX trunks in their monitoring reports, which show that Pacific holds
   97% and 80% of the residential and business markets, respectively. This
   switching and collocation analysis is misleading, oversimplified, and
   speaks all too generally of an overstated potential for market growth
   that does not currently exist. Pacific's attempts to establish that
   current telecommunications competition will continue to flourish when
   it gains control of the long distance market are thwarted by its
   inability to produce convincing supporting evidence. Pacific's
   assessment of the level of competition in California is clearly
   inflated, especially when considering the current status of the DSL
   market. Section 271 authorization will be the final step in Pacific's
   total market price-making monopoly, and substantial harm will be done
   to consumers and competition in its wake. Section 709.2 of the Public
   Utilities Code requires the Commission to ensure that this does not
   happen in the state of California, and this provision stands apart from
   the 14-point competitive checklist under Section 271. Finally, the
   statute requires that the Commission make the required determinations
   pursuant to a hearing process. Evidentiary hearings are required, both
   to satisfy the statute and to test the validity, or lack thereof, of
   Pacific's assertions in the various Affidavits. ORA concludes that
   Pacific has not met the requirements of Public Utilities Code Section
   709.2. IX. CONCLUSION ORA acknowledges that since 1998 Pacific has made
   significant progress in its efforts to satisfy the requirements of
   Section 271, to irreversibly open the local market to competition.
   Unfortunately, Pacific is not there yet. As discussed above, many of
   the affidavits do not contain sufficient evidence to support a finding
   of compliance, or demonstrate that Pacific is not in compliance.
   Evidentiary hearings are required to assess the validity and veracity
   of Pacific's affidavits. As the many affidavits reflect, the rules
   under which the RBOCs must operate are subject to change due to the
   multiple legal challenges arising from FCC Orders. While a particular
   Section 271 filing represents a ``snapshot'' in time, evaluated against
   the then-current FCC rules, this Commission cannot simply grant
   approval in California, support the Application at the FCC, and then
   wash its hands of the matter. The actions of the federal courts will
   affect the Commission's responsibilities for implementing the
   market-opening, pro-competitive requirements of the Act. The CPUC will
   retain significant responsibilities downstream of an FCC approval of
   SBC's California application, including, but by no means limited to,
   monitoring of OSS performance and any incentive payments, and
   conducting audits. Any decision granting Section 271 approval must be
   based upon actual and verifiable evidence. Pacific is not yet providing
   nondiscriminatory service to CLECs, because it is still failing parity
   tests. In addition, there were so many problems with the OSS testing
   process that it cannot reasonably be relied upon by the Commission to
   make a decision. For this and the other reasons detailed above, SBC's
   Section 271 application should not be approved. Furthermore, ORA
   recommends that the Commission not approve Pacific's Application until
   the Commission (1) establishes appropriate TELRIC compliant UNE prices,
   including geographically deaveraged UNE rates, (2) establishes costs
   and prices for additional UNEs that do not currently have TELRIC
   prices, (3) votes out a final decision on OSS performance remedy
   levels, (4) determines that, based upon the preponderance of the data
   gathered from a subsequent application of the Commission's performance
   measures to Pacific's OSS over a specified period of time, Pacific is
   definitively determined to be providing parity, nondiscriminatory
   service to CLECs, and (5) the Commission establishes ``permanent''
   prices for line sharing and line splitting, and completes unbundling of
   the Project Pronto architecture. ORA concludes that Pacific has
   satisfied the following Section 251/271 requirements: Section
   271(c)(2)(B)(iii) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(ix) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(xii)
   Section 251(c)(2)(A) ORA further concludes that Pacific has not
   provided sufficient evidence to find that it has satisfied the
   following Section 251/271 requirements: Section 271(c)(2)(B)(xiii)
   Section 251(c)(2)(B) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(vii) Section
   271(c)(2)(B)(viii) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(x) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(xiv)
   ORA also concludes that Pacific has not yet satisfied the following
   Section 251/271 requirements: Section 251(c)(2)(C) Section 251(c)(2)(D)
   Section 271(c)(2)(B)(i) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(ii) Section
   271(c)(2)(B)(iv) Section 271(c)(2)(B)(v) Finally, ORA concludes that
   Pacific has not satisfied the requirements of Section 272 of the Act,
   and Section 709.2 of the Public Utilities Code. Accordingly, ORA
   recommends that the Commission not approve Pacific's Section 271
   application at this time. Respectfully submitted, Darwin E. Farrar
   Attorney for the Office of Ratepayer Advocates California Public
   Utilities Commission 505 Van Ness Ave. San Francisco, CA 94102 Phone:
   (415) 703-1599 Fax: (415) 703-2262 August 23, 2001 Email:
   edf@cpuc.ca.gov CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE I hereby certify that I have
   this day served the foregoing document entitled ``BRIEF OF THE OFFICE
   OF RATEPAYER ADVOCATES ON THE APPLICATION BY SBC FOR PROVISION OF
   IN-REGION, INTERLATA SERVICES IN CALIFORNIA AND COMPLIANCE WITH PUBLIC
   UTILITIES CODE SECTION 709.2'' upon all known parties of record in this
   proceeding by mailing by first-class mail a copy thereof properly
   addressed to each party. Dated at San Francisco, California, this 23rd
   day of August, 2001. Martha Perez In the Matter of the Implementation
   of the Local Competition Provisions in the Federal Telecommunications
   Act of 1996, Inter-Carrier Compensation for ISP-Bound Traffic, Order on
   Remand and Report and Order, CC Docket Nos. 96-98 and 99-68, FCC 01-131
   (Released April 27, 2001). A.01-02-024/A.01-02-035. See D.99-11-050,
   Ordering Paragraph 11. See Implementation of the Local Competition
   Provisions in the Telecommunications Act of 1996, CC Docket 96-98, FCC
   96-325, released August 8, 1996. (First Report And Order). See also 47
   C.F.R. Section 51.507(f). CLECC00-039 ``Notification of Pacific's
   Intention to Implement Geographically De-Averaged UNE Rates in
   California, effective May 1, 2000 - California'', February 16, 2000
   ``The FAR expressed concern with the data set that AT&T used to develop
   its four-zone proposal. The arbitrator also found that the policy
   consequences of AT&T's Zone One Business District warrants further
   Commission scrutiny prior to being adopted. The rigorous scrutiny
   needed can only be performed in the context of a generic Commission
   proceeding.'' D.00-08-011, p. 8. The Commission acknowledged the
   problems with the data set when it stated in the Order Instituting
   Investigation on geographic deaveraging that, ``...given the
   substantial amounts of data submitted in the OANAD record, the question
   repeatedly has arisen whether any measure of that data, properly
   updated, could be appropriately used to generate geographically
   deaveraged prices.'' (See I.00-03-002, p.5) The comparisons made in Mr.
   Gregg's Survey are based on residential rates effective October, 1998.
   The surcharges and taxes were those in effect at that time. The
   increase in the SLC became effective July 1, 2001. The effect of this
   increase is to reduce the ratio of UNE-P rates and charges to the
   average residential rates below what they would be if only 1998 rates
   and charges were used. ORA based its analysis upon Attachment A of the
   Vandeloop Affidavit, ``A Survey of Unbundled Network Element Prices in
   the United States,'' by Billy Jack Gregg, Director, Consumer Advocate
   Division, Public Service Commission of West Virginia. To his
   calculation of total costs using UNEs, ORA added $ .93 cents for
   vertical services, $1.36 for shared transport and 14.44% for local and
   state taxes and surcharges. This calculation represents the cost to
   CLECs of using the UNE-P. The Average Residential Rate was taken from
   the FCC's Book of Rates, Price Indicies, and Expenditures for Telephone
   Service, Table 1.3 ``Residential Telephone Rates in the Sample
   Cities,'' published June, 1999, with rates effective as of October 15,
   1998, for Los Angeles. In an email message sent to ORA on July 23,
   2001, Mr. Gregg wrote that he used the rate for Los Angeles, $17.51,
   and added the incremental change in the SLC, $1.50, and the FUSF,
   $0.51, to come up with $19.52. This fact was confirmed by the FCC
   Industry Analysis Division's Keith Brown, who was responsible for
   developing the Reference Book of Price Indices and Expenditures for
   Telephone Service. See Affidavit of Linda Vandeloop, p. 14. See First
   Report And Order, Paragraph 412. In order for the price for the port to
   be provided to CLECs in a nondiscriminatory fashion that complies with
   the Act, CLECs should be entitled to the use of the vertical features
   as part of the price they pay for the port, rather than billed
   separately for each vertical service. See Ex Parte Communication of
   AT&T (A.01-02-035/A.01-02-024) with Commissioner Wood's Office, June
   18, 2001. See Attachment B, Chart 1. See, for example, Pacific Bell
   Telephone Company's Updated Summary Of Issues Raised At April 4-5, 2001
   Hearings, p.16. See Renewed Motion of Pacific Bell Telephone Company
   for an Order that it has Satisfied the Requirements of the 14-Point
   Checklist in 271 of the Telecommunications Act of 1996, 271 Filing,
   June 27, 2001, p. 2. See Draft Brief, p. i. In the Commission's Line
   Sharing Proceeding, Pacific's witness Debra Aron admitted that unlike
   other states or regions, DSL access was running well ahead of cable
   modem access to the Internet in California. Testimony of Debra J. Aron
   on Behalf of Pacific Bell, June 22, 2001, p. 19. Nevertheless, Pacific
